Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.560

Automatic fingerprint information system—Report.

(1) To support criminal justice services in the local communities throughout this state, the state patrol shall develop a plan for and implement an automatic fingerprint information system. In implementing the automatic fingerprint information system, the state patrol shall either purchase or lease the appropriate computer systems. If the state patrol leases a system, the lease agreement shall include purchase options. The state patrol shall procure the most efficient system available.

(2) The state patrol shall report on the automatic fingerprint information system to the legislature no later than January 1, 1987. The report shall include a time line for implementing each stage, a local agency financial participation analysis, a system analysis, a full cost/purchase analysis, a vendor bid evaluation, and a space location analysis that includes a site determination. The state patrol shall coordinate the preparation of this report with the office of financial management.

[ 1986 c 196 s 1.]